Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska82-107
Director of the Nebraska State Historical Society; public documents, records, relics; procedure after notice.

Whenever the Director of the Nebraska State Historical Society receives notice as described in section 82-106, the society shall, by its officers or employees, examine the material and remove and receipt for whatever material the society may deem to be of historic value. The society shall transport the material at its own cost to its museum and shall catalog, arrange, and display the material for the free use of the public.

Laws 1905, c. 157, § 4, p. 605;

R.S.1913, § 7172;

C.S.1922, § 6823;

C.S.1929, § 82-107;

R.S.1943, § 82-107;

Laws 2024, LB1169, § 8.
July 19, 2024